Vermont, session 2025-2026, H376.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Labeling Requirement; U.S. Standard Drink Equivalent * * *
Sec. 1. FINDINGS, INTENT, AND SHORT TITLE
(a) The General Assembly finds:
(1) the State of Vermont is currently experiencing an education funding
crisis and one of the central drivers of the increased education fund pressures
are the costs associated with treating mental health needs of youth and
families;
(2) there is a need to fund mental health, treatment, and recovery
resources;
(3) the consumption of alcoholic beverages is a significant factor for
mental health, overdoses, and cancer diagnoses;
(4) the responsible consumption of alcoholic beverages requires that the
consumer be adequately informed of the beverage and its contents; and
(5) according to the 2024 Direct to Consumer Shipping Pilot Program
conducted by the Department of Liquor and Lottery, 100% of the direct-to-
consumer shipments received under the Program failed to fully comply with
Vermont law.
(b) Therefore, it is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) all alcoholic beverages sold in the State bear a label that discloses
the alcohol content in a form and manner that adequately informs the consumer
VT LEG #379060 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.376
2025 Page 3 of 7
of serving size and that alcohol content labeling be consistent throughout all
beverage alcohol categories; and
(2) the gallonage tax on certain alcoholic beverages be increased to
offset the continuing costs of support services and that all proceeds be
deposited in a special fund for that purpose.
Sec. 2. 7 V.S.A. § 6 is added to read:
§ 6. ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CONTAINERS; LABELING
(a) Malt beverages, vinous beverages, and ready-to-drink spirits beverages.
A manufacturer or rectifier of malt beverages, vinous beverages, or ready-to-
drink spirits beverages shall not sell or distribute its alcoholic beverages in the
State unless the labeling or packaging of the product includes a statement of
alcohol content in U.S. Standard Drinks. The statement of alcohol content in
U.S. Standard drinks shall be in a format permitted under the labeling
regulations adopted by the Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau.
(b) Spirits and fortified wines. The Department of Liquor and Lottery, and
any manufacturer or rectifier that sells unopened containers at a fourth-class
location, shall affix a statement of alcohol content label on all spirits and
fortified wines sold in the State. The label shall state the alcohol content of the
beverage in U.S. Standard Drinks. The Department shall provide labels to the
holder of a fourth-class license for purposes of labeling unopened containers
sold from the premises. The Department may adopt requirements for the form,
VT LEG #379060 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.376
2025 Page 4 of 7
format, and contents of the label by rule pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25,
provided that the statement of alcohol content shall be in a format permitted
under the labeling regulations adopted by the Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and
Trade Bureau.
(c) Any alcoholic beverage sold in the State shall bear a cancer warning
and serving facts label. The cancer warning shall state “WARNING: Drinking
alcoholic beverages may increase cancer risk and, if consumed during
pregnancy, can cause birth defects.” The serving facts label shall state the
following:
(1) serving size in U.S. Standard Drinks;
(2) alcohol by volume;
(3) calories per U.S. Standard Drink; and
(4) measurements in grams for total fat, saturated fat, sodium, total
carbohydrates, total sugars, added sugars, and protein.
* * * Taxes on Alcoholic Beverages * * *
Sec. 3. 7 V.S.A. § 421 is amended to read:
§ 421. TAX ON MALT AND VINOUS BEVERAGES
(a) Every packager and wholesale dealer shall pay to the Commissioner of
Taxes:
(1) the sum of 26 and one-half cents $1.36 per gallon for every gallon or
its equivalent of:
VT LEG #379060 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.376
2025 Page 5 of 7
(A) malt beverages containing not more than six percent of alcohol
by volume at 60 degrees Fahrenheit sold by them to retailers in the State; and
(B) or hard ciders containing not more than seven percent of alcohol
by volume at 60 degrees Fahrenheit sold by them to retailers in the State;
(2) the sum of 55 cents $3.75 per gallon for each gallon of:
(A) malt beverages containing more than six percent of alcohol by
volume at 60 degrees Fahrenheit;
(B) hard ciders containing more than seven percent of alcohol by
volume at 60 degrees Fahrenheit sold by them to retailers in the State; and
(C) vinous beverages sold by them to retailers in the State; and
(3) the sum of $1.10 $1.36 per gallon of ready-to-drink spirits beverages
sold by them to retailers in the State.
* * *
(g) Beginning on July 1, 2027 and on each subsequent July 1, the sums in
subsection (a) of this section shall be increased by the percentage increase of
the Consumer Price Index, CPI-U, U.S. city average, not seasonally adjusted,
or successor index, as calculated by the U.S. Department of Labor or successor
agency for the 12 months preceding the previous September 1. The sums shall
be rounded off to the nearest $0.01.
VT LEG #379060 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.376
2025 Page 6 of 7
Sec. 4. 7 V.S.A. § 421a is added to read:
§ 421a. TREATMENT AND RECOVERY FUND
(a) There is created the Treatment and Recovery Fund, a special fund
established and managed pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5 and
administered by the Department of Health. The Fund shall consist of all
monies collected by the Commissioner of Taxes pursuant to section 421 of this
chapter and 50 percent of the monies collected by Board of Liquor and Lottery
pursuant to section 424 of this chapter.
(b) The Department of Health shall submit a spending plan to the General
Assembly annually on or before November 15. The Department shall disburse
monies from the Fund pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 3.
(c) Expenditures from the Fund may be used to support any program that
provides:
(1) mental health support for primary and postsecondary schools, with
priority given to the support for student assistance professionals; or
(2) treatment or supportive housing for individuals with alcohol use
disorder.
Sec. 5. 7 V.S.A. § 422 is amended to read:
§ 422. TAX ON SPIRITS AND FORTIFIED WINES
(a) A tax of five 10 percent is assessed on the gross revenue from the sale
of spirits and fortified wines in the State of Vermont by the Board of Liquor
VT LEG #379060 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.376
2025 Page 7 of 7
and Lottery or the retail sale of spirits and fortified wines in Vermont by a
manufacturer or rectifier of spirits or fortified wines, in accordance with the
provisions of this title.
* * *
* * * Study; Manufacturer and Retailer Compliance * * *
Sec. 6. DIVISION OF LIQUOR CONTROL; STUDY AND REPORT;
MANUFACTURER, DISTRIBUTOR, AND RETAILER
COMPLIANCE
On or before November 15, 2024, the Division of Liquor Control shall
submit to the House Committee on Government Operations and Military
Affairs and the Senate Committee on Economic Development, Housing and
General Affairs a written report concerning the legal compliance of alcoholic
beverage manufacturers, distributors, and retailers with the requirements of
Vermont’s consumer shipping laws. The Division shall specifically study and
report on the rate of compliance for any person offering the online sale of
alcoholic beverages, the Division’s current and planned compliance monitoring
programs, and recommended legislation or appropriations to support and
improve compliance with Vermont’s consumer shipping laws.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379060 v.2